Massachusetts, session 194th, H4997.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 274 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 4, the word “felon.” and inserting in
place thereof the following language:-
felon; provided, however, that whoever is punished under this section when the predicate
felony is a violation of section 1 of chapter 265 may be punished in the manner provided for the
punishment of the principal felon or for any term of years.
of 1